Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1942
Transfers.

(a) Except as set forth in or authorized by the articles or bylaws, no member of a mutual benefit corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

(b) No member of a public benefit or religious corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

(c) When transfer rights have been provided, no restriction on them shall be binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued prior to the adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved by the members and the affected member.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 42.